apertium-sah.sah.twol
Alphabet

   А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О Ө П Р С Т У Ү Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я Һ Ҥ Ҕ
   а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о ө п р с т у ү ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я һ ҥ ҕ

   !%{E%}:а %{E%}:э %{E%}:ө %{E%}:о

   !%{A%}:а %{A%}:э %{A%}:ө %{A%}:о
   %{A%}:а
   !%{I%}:и %{I%}:у %{I%}:ү %{I%}:ы
   %{I%}:ы

   %{L%}:л ! %{L%}:т %{L%}:д %{L%}:н
   %{T%}:т ! %{T%}:д %{T%}:л %{T%}:н

   %{B%}:б ! %{B%}:п %{B%}:м

   %{G%}:г ! %{G%}:к %{G%}:ҕ %{G%}:х %{G%}:ҥ

   %{i%}:0 ! %{i%}:и %{i%}:у %{i%}:ү %{i%}:ы

   %{y%}:0 ! %{y%}:и %{y%}:у %{y%}:ү %{y%}:ы

   %{n%}:0 ! %{n%}:н

   %{t%}:0 ! %{t%}:т

   %{a%}:0

   %{р%}:р

   %{☭%}:0

   %{╳%}:0 ! ry: for plural px3pl
   %{Л%}:л
   %{R%}:р ! ry: for plural px3pl
   
   !!! this marker is always present in possessive forms,
   !!! used later in the word by "LOC" suffix
   %{Z%}:0

   %{ъ%}:0

   %>:0 ;


Sets

Vow = Я Ю Ё А О Ы У Э Е И Ө Ү
      я ю ё а о ы у э е и ө ү ;

RealVow = А О Ы У Э И Ө Ү
          а о ы у э и ө ү ;

LowVow = Я Ё А О Э Е Ө
         я ё а о э е ө ;

HighVow = Ю Ы У И Ү
          ю ы у и ү ;

Nasal = М Н Ҥ
        м н ҥ ;

HighSonCns = Й Р
             й р ;

VoicelessCns = П Д Т К Х С З Ж В
               п д т к х с з ж в ;

Obs = Б В Г Д Ж З К П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Һ Ҕ
      б в г д ж з к п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ һ ҕ ;

Cons = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Һ Ҥ Ҕ
       б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ һ ҥ ҕ ;


Rules

!"Vowel deletion"
!%{A%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{I%}: ; 

"remove L for plural px3pl"
%{Л%}:0 <=> _ ?* %{╳%}: ;  ! ry: for plural px3pl

! %{A%}:0 <=> _ ?* %{╳%}: ;  ! ry: for plural px3pl

"remove R for plural px3pl"
%{R%}:0 <=> _ ?* %{╳%}: ;  ! ry: for plural px3pl


!!!== regressive assimilation ==!!!

"т assimilation"
т:Cy <=> _ %>: Cx: ;
     except
         [ :н | :с | :к ] _ %>:/[ :0 - %>: ] ;
     where Cx in ( %{B%} %{G%} ) ! %{L%} ) 
           Cy in (   п     к   ) !  т ) 
     matched ;  

"{р} → л before л"
%{р%}:л <=> _ [ :л | [ %{L%}: - :Obs ] ]/:0 ;


! FIXME: These two rules should probably be generalised
"н→ҥ assimilation"
н:ҥ <=> _ :ҥ/:0 ; 

"н→м assimilation"
н:м <=> _ %>: %{B%}: ; 

!!!== progressive assimilation ==!!!

!!! this also works for %{T%} for most cases,
!!! but we treat %{T%} separetely because of POSS+LOC -- below
"Assimilation after nasals"
Cx:Cy <=> :Nasal [ :0 - т: ]* _ ;
      except  
              _ ?* %{╳%}: ;  ! ry: for plural px3pl
      where Cx in ( %{L%} %{Л%} %{G%} %{B%} )
            Cy in (   н     н     ҥ     м   )
      matched ;

!!!
"POSS+LOC"
Cx:Cy <=> :Nasal [ :0 - т: ]* _ ;
	  %{Z%}: ?* _ ;
      except  
              _ ?* %{╳%}: ;  ! ry: for plural px3pl
      where Cx in ( %{T%} )
            Cy in (   н   )
      matched ;
	  
"Assimilation after high-sonority obstruents"
Cx:Cy <=> :HighSonCns/:0 _ ;
      except  
              %{Z%}: ?* _ ;
              _ ?* %{╳%}: ;  ! ry: for plural px3pl
      where Cx in ( %{L%} %{Л%} %{T%} )
            Cy in (   д     д     д   )
      matched ;

"Assimilation after voiceless consonants"
Cx:Cy <=> :VoicelessCns/:0 _ ;
      except  
              _ ?* %{╳%}: ;  ! ry: for plural px3pl
      where Cx in ( %{L%} %{Л%} %{B%} )
            Cy in (   т     т     п   )
      matched ;

"{T} → л"
%{T%}:л <=> :л/:0 _ ; 
      except  
              %{Z%}: ?* _ ;

"{G} after х"
%{G%}:х <=> :х/:0 _ ;

"{G} after voiceless consonants besides х"
%{G%}:к <=> [ :VoicelessCns - :х]/:0 _ ;


!!!== deletion ==!!!

"{р} deletes before obstruents or something"
%{р%}:0 <=> _ :Obs/:0 ;


!!!== epenthesis ==!!!

"т after a vowel"
%{t%}:т <=> :Vow/:0 _ ;

"н after a vowel"
%{n%}:н <=> :Vow/:0 _ ;
            !@ и д е я >:0 {n}:н {I}:ы


!!!== lenition ==!!!

"intervocalic lenition"
Cx:Cy <=> :Vow/:0* _ [ %>: :Vow]/[ :0 - %>: ]* ;
             !@ и с:һ {y}:и т
          ! :Vow/:0* _ :0* %>: :0* :Vow ;
          !    !е к:__ т:0 {☭}:0 >:0 {t}:0 {A}:а
          :Vow _ %{y%}:Vow ; 
      where Cx in ( х с к п )
            Cy in ( ҕ һ г б )
      matched ;


"{G} after low vowel"
%{G%}:ҕ <=> :LowVow/:0 _ ;
            !@ Е в р о п а >:0 {G}:ҕ {A}:а


!!!== Vowel Harmony ==!!!

"vowel harmony for {i}"
%{i%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;
         except 
             _ %>: %{A%}: ; ! because {i}:0 >:0 {A}: 
                !@ э:э {T}:т {i}:0 >:0 {A}:э
         where Vx in ( а о ы у э е и ө ү я )
               Vy in ( ы у ы у и и и ү ү ы )
         matched ;



"vowel harmony for {y}"
%{y%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;
         except 
             _ [ :Cons :Vow ]/:0* ;
             !@ ис{y}т
         where Vx in ( а о ы у э е и ө ү я )
               Vy in ( ы у ы у и и и ү ү ы )
         matched ;


"vowel harmony for {I}"
%{I%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ]* _ ;
             %{I%}:Vx _ ;
         except
         !    ! [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ]  %>: [ :Cons* ]/:0* _ ;
         !    %{☭%}: [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;
         where Vx in ( а о ы у э е и ө ү я )
               Vy in ( ы у ы у и и и ү ү ы )
         matched ;


!!FIXME! ф а к у л ь т е т {☭}:0 >:0 {n}: {I}:

!@ б у о л >:0 {I}:у {A}:а х >:0 т {A}:а {A}:а х

"vowel harmony for {A} except after уо and үө"
%{A%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ]* _ ;
             ! :Cons :Vx _ ;  ! FIXME: When does this happen?
             %{A%}:Vx _ ;
         except
              _ ?* %{╳%}: ; ! ry: for plural px3pl
             :ү :ө [ :Cons* :Cons]/:0* _ ;
             :у :о [ :Cons* :Cons]/:0* _ ;
             ! :Vow :Vow %>: _ ; 
             !    ! for verb stems ending in long vowel or diphthong
             !%{ъ%}: %>: [ :Cons* ]/:0* _ ; 
             %{☭%}: [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;
         where Vx in ( а о ы у э е и ө ү я )
               Vy in ( а о а а э э э ө э а )
         matched ;

"{A} as part of {I}{A}"
%{A%}:Vy <=> %{I%}:Vx _ ;
         except
              _ ?* %{╳%}: ; ! ry: for plural px3pl
             :RealVow :RealVow %>: %{I%}:Vx _ ;
         where Vx in ( и ү ы у )
               Vy in ( э ө а о )
         matched ;

"{A} deletes after long vowels and diphthongs and triggers other stuff (and as part of {I}{A})"
%{A%}:0 <=> :RealVow :RealVow %>: (%{I%}:) _ ;
            _ ?* %{╳%}: ;   ! ry: for plural px3pl



"{I} deletes after long vowels and diphthongs and triggers other stuff"
%{I%}:0 <=> :RealVow :RealVow %>: _ ;

"first element of diphthongs and long vowels immediately before ({I}){A}"
Vx:Vy <=> _ :RealVow %>: (%{I%}:) %{A%}: ;
      where Vx in ( а о э ө )
            Vy in ( ы у и ү )
      matched ;

!"first element of diphthongs and long vowels immediately before {I}{A}"
!Vx:Vy <=> _ :RealVow %>: %{I%}: %{A%}: ;
!      where Vx in ( э а о ө )
!            Vy in ( и ы у ү )
!      matched ;

"second element of diphthongs and long vowels immediately before {A}"
Vx:Vy <=> :RealVow _ %>: %{A%}: ;
      where Vx in ( а о э ө )
            Vy in ( ы у и ү )
      matched ;

"vowel harmony for {a} except after уо and үө"
%{a%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;
         except
             :ү :ө [ :Cons* :Cons]/:0* _ ;
             :у :о [ :Cons* :Cons]/:0* _ ;
         where Vx in ( а о ы у э е и ө ү я )
               Vy in ( а о а а э э э ө э а )
         matched ;

"vowel harmony for {a} after үө"
%{a%}:э <=> :ү :ө [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;

!FIXME 
"vowel harmony for {I} after back harmony marker"
%{I%}:ы <=> :Vow [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;
            ! [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] %>: [ :Cons* ]/:0* _ ;            
        except
            :Vow [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ]* _ ;



!!!== Defaults that shouldn't be necessary ==!!!

"{G} after high vowel"
%{G%}:г <=> :HighVow/:0 _ ;
            :HighSonCns/:0 _ ;
            :л/:0 _ ;  

!@ с ы л >:0 {G}:г {A}:а

"vowel harmony for {A} after уо etc."
! shouldn't need a rule because it's the default а, but doesn't seem to work without one
%{A%}:а <=> :у :о [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;
            ! %{ъ%}: %>: [ :Cons* ]/:0* _ ;            
            :Vow [ :Cons* :Cons %{☭%}: ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ]* _ ;
            :Vow [ :Cons* %{☭%}: :Cons ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ]* _ ;
            :Vow [ %{☭%}: :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ]* _ ;
            ! :Cons/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ] %{☭%}: _ ;
            ! %{☭%}: :Cons/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ] _ ;
            ! :Vow %{☭%}: [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ]* _ ;
               !компьютер{ъ}>{L}{A}р
               !@ Д ь о к у у с к а й >:0 {T}:д {A}:а {A}:а ҕ {I}:ы
            ! :Vow [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ]* %{☭%}: _ ;
            ! :Vow [ :Cons* %{☭%}: :Cons ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ]* _ ;
        except
            _ ?* %{╳%}: ;   ! ry: for plural px3pl
            :ү :ө [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;
               ! protects against үө forms with %{☭%} (haha!)


"vowel harmony for {A} after үө"
%{A%}:э <=> :ү :ө [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;
          except
            _ ?* %{╳%}: ;   ! ry: for plural px3pl
!             %{ъ%}: %>: [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ; 

"vowel harmony for {a} after уо"
! shouldn't need a rule because it's the default а, but doesn't seem to work without one
%{a%}:а <=> :у :о [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;

!"Epenthesis in some stems"
!%{y%}:0 <=> _ [ :Cons :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;
!   !@ ис{y}т>{A}{р}

"Delete т after н or с when not at the end of a word"
т:0 <=> [ :н | :с | :к ] _ %>:/[ :0 - %>: ] ;
